Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-126
Public market; establishment; regulation.

A city of the second class shall have the power to purchase, hold, and own grounds for and to erect, establish, and regulate market houses and market places.

Laws 1879, § 39, VII, p. 201;

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 195;

R.S.1913, § 5020;

C.S.1922, § 4189;

C.S.1929, § 17-128;

R.S.1943, § 17-126;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 21.